Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-3,168
Proof of financial responsibility required; violation; penalty.

It shall be unlawful for any owner to pay the required registration fees when the owner does not, at the time of paying the fees or during the entire registration period, have or keep in effect a current and effective automobile liability policy or proof of financial responsibility. Any person violating this section shall be guilty of a Class IV misdemeanor. The penalty shall be mandatory and shall not be suspended by a court.

Laws 2005, LB 274, § 168.